New York, session 2025-2026, A1866.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 630-m to 2 read as follows: 3 § 630-m. Gift to the congressional chartered veterans service organ- 4 izations fund. Effective for any tax year commencing on or after January 5 first, two thousand twenty-six, an individual may elect to contribute to 6 the congressional chartered veterans service organizations fund created 7 pursuant to section ninety-nine-ss of the state finance law for the 8 support of congressional chartered veterans service organizations, who 9 help assist veterans in gaining access to the United States department 10 of veterans affairs benefits and the state department of veterans' 11 services benefits they are entitled to. Such contribution shall be in 12 any whole dollar amount and shall not reduce the amount of tax owed by 13 such individual. The commissioner shall include space on the personal 14 income tax return to enable a taxpayer to make such contribution. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all revenue collected pursu- 16 ant to this section shall be credited to the fund and used only for the 17 purposes of the congressional chartered veterans service organizations. 18 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-ss to 19 read as follows: 20 § 99-ss. Congressional chartered veterans service organizations fund. 21 1. There is hereby created in the joint custody of the state comptroller 22 and the commissioner of taxation and finance a fund to be known as the 23 "congressional chartered veterans service organizations fund". Monies in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01933-01-5 A. 1866 2 1 the fund shall be kept separate from and not commingled with other funds 2 held in the sole custody of the commissioner of taxation and finance. 3 2. Such fund shall consist of all revenues received by the department 4 of taxation and finance, pursuant to the provisions of section six 5 hundred thirty-m of the tax law and all other moneys appropriated, cred- 6 ited, or transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to 7 law. Nothing contained herein shall prevent the state from receiving 8 grants, gifts or bequests for the purposes of the fund as defined in 9 this section and depositing them into the fund according to law. 10 3. Moneys of the fund may be invested by the state comptroller, and 11 income from the investments of moneys deposited to this fund pursuant to 12 section six hundred thirty-m of the tax law shall be credited solely to 13 this fund. 14 4. Monies of the fund shall, after appropriation by the legislature, 15 be made available to the department of veterans' services for grants to 16 congressional chartered veterans service organizations who help assist 17 veterans in gaining access to the United States department of veterans 18 affairs benefits and the state department of veterans' services benefits 19 they are entitled to. The state commissioner of veterans' services shall 20 promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the distribution of such 21 grants. 22 5. To the extent practicable, the state commissioner of veterans' 23 services shall ensure that all moneys received during a fiscal year are 24 expended prior to the end of that fiscal year. 25 6. On or before the first day of February each year, the comptroller 26 shall certify to the governor, temporary president of the senate, speak- 27 er of the assembly, chair of the senate finance committee and chair of 28 the assembly ways and means committee, the amount of money deposited in 29 the congressional chartered veterans service organizations fund during 30 the preceding calendar year as the result of revenue derived pursuant to 31 section six hundred thirty-m of the tax law and any income generated 32 from investments of the moneys in the fund in accordance with subdivi- 33 sion three of this section. 34 7. On or before the first day of February each year, the state commis- 35 sioner of veterans' services shall provide a written report to the 36 temporary president of the senate, speaker of the assembly, chair of the 37 senate finance committee, chair of the assembly ways and means commit- 38 tee, chair of the senate veterans, homeland security and military 39 affairs committee, chair of the assembly veterans' affairs committee, 40 and the public. Such report shall include how the monies of the fund 41 were utilized during the preceding calendar year and shall include: 42 (a) the amount of money disbursed from the fund; 43 (b) the recipients of awards from the fund; 44 (c) the amount awarded to each recipient; 45 (d) the purposes for which such awards were granted; and 46 (e) a summary financial plan for such monies which shall include esti- 47 mates of all receipts and all disbursements for the current and succeed- 48 ing fiscal years, along with the actual results from the prior fiscal 49 year. 50 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.